Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 15 Miscellaneous Offenses
21-2-577.
Improper removal of ballots from book of official ballots.

Any person removing any ballot from any book of official ballots, except in the manner provided by this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1931, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-578.
Unfolding, opening, or prying into ballots.

Any person who, before any ballot is deposited in the ballot box as provided by this chapter, willfully unfolds, opens, or pries into any such ballot with the intent to discover the manner in which the same has been marked shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1923, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 31/HB 540.

21-2-579.
Fraudulently allowing ballot or voting machine to be seen; casting unofficial ballot; receiving unauthorized assistance in voting.

Any voter at any primary or election who:

Allows his or her ballot or the face of the voting machine used by him or her to be seen by any person with the apparent intention of letting it be known for a fraudulent purpose how he or she is about to vote;

Casts or attempts to cast any other than the official ballot which has been given to him or her by the proper poll officer, or advises or procures another to do so;

Without having made the affirmation under oath or declaration required by Code Section 21-2-409, or when the disability which he or she declared at the time of registration no longer exists, permits another to accompany him or her into the voting compartment or voting machine booth or to mark his or her ballot or to register his or her vote on the voting machine or direct recording electronic (DRE) equipment or use an electronic ballot marker; or

States falsely to any poll officer that because of his or her inability to read the English language or because of blindness, near-blindness, or other physical disability he or she cannot mark the ballot or operate the voting machine without assistance

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1925, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 911, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 62; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 32/HB 540; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 45/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, inserted “or use an electronic ballot marker” near the end of paragraph (3).

Cross references.

Fraud generally, §

23-2-50

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-580.
Tampering with, damaging, improper preparation of, or prevention of proper operation of voting machines or electronic ballot markers or tabulating machines.

Any person who:

Unlawfully opens, tampers with, or damages any voting machine or electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine to be used or being used at any primary or election;

Willfully prepares a voting machine or an electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine for use in a primary or election in improper order for voting; or

Prevents or attempts to prevent the correct operation of such electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine or voting machine

shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1915, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 46/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, inserted “or electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine” in paragraph (1); inserted “or an electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine” in paragraph (2); and inserted “electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine or voting” in paragraph (3).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-581.
Unauthorized making or possession of voting machine key.

Any unauthorized person who makes or knowingly has in his or her possession a key to a voting machine to be used or being used in any primary or election shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1916, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-582.
Tampering with, damaging, or preventing of proper operation of direct recording electronic equipment or electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine or device.

Any person who tampers with or damages any direct recording electronic (DRE) equipment or electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine or device to be used or being used at or in connection with any primary or election or who prevents or attempts to prevent the correct operation of any direct recording electronic (DRE) equipment or electronic ballot marker or tabulating machine or device shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1917, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 63; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 47/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, twice inserted “or electronic ballot marker”, and twice substituted “tabulating machine” for “tabulating computer” in this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-582.1.
Penalty for voting equipment modification.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “voting equipment” shall mean a voting machine, tabulating machine, optical scanning voting system, direct recording electronic voting system, or electronic ballot marker.

Any person or entity, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer or seller of voting equipment, who alters, modifies, or changes any aspect of such voting equipment without prior approval of the Secretary of State is guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-582.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 17; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 64; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 48/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, in subsection (a), deleted “or” following “voting system,” and added “, or electronic ballot marker” at the end; and substituted “including, but not limited to,” for “including but not limited to” in subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-583.
Removal or destruction of election supplies or conveniences.

Any person who:

Prior to any primary or election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any notice or list of candidates posted in accordance with this chapter;

During any primary or election, willfully defaces, tears down, removes, or destroys any card of instructions, notice of penalties, or diagram printed or posted for the instruction of electors; or

During any primary or election, willfully removes or destroys any of the supplies or conveniences furnished to any polling place in order to enable electors to vote or the poll officers to perform their duties

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1918, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-584.
Refusal or failure of manager to administer oath to poll officer; poll officer acting without being sworn; giving of false certification as to swearing of poll officer.

If any manager refuses or willfully fails to administer the oath to the poll officer in the manner required by this chapter, or if any poll officer shall knowingly act without being first duly sworn, or if any such person shall sign the written form of oath without being duly sworn, or if any manager or any other person authorized to administer oaths shall certify that any such person was sworn when he or she was not, he or she shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1907, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-585.
Refusal by superintendent or his or her employee to permit public inspection of documents; removal, destruction, or alteration of documents.

Any superintendent or employee of his or her office who willfully refuses to permit the public inspection or copying, in accordance with this chapter, of any general or duplicate return sheet, tally paper, affidavit, petition, certificate, paper, account, contract, report, or any other document or record in his or her custody, or who willfully removes any such document or record from his or her office during said period, or who permits the same to be removed, except pursuant to the direction of any competent authority, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any superintendent or employee of his or her office who willfully destroys or alters, or permits to be destroyed or altered, any document described in subsection (a) of this Code section during the period for which the same is required to be kept shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1904, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Requirement that superintendent open primary and election records to inspection by public, §

21-2-72

.

21-2-586.
Refusal by Secretary of State or his or her employee to permit public inspection of documents; removal, destruction, or alteration of documents.

If the Secretary of State or any employee of his or her office willfully refuses to permit the public inspection or copying, in accordance with this chapter, of any return, petition, certificate, paper, account, contract, report, or any other document or record in his or her custody, except when in use, or willfully removes any such document or record from his or her office during such period or permits the same to be removed, except pursuant to the direction of competent authority, the Secretary of State or employee of his or her office shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

If the Secretary of State or any employee of his or her office willfully destroys, alters, or permits to be destroyed or altered any document described in subsection (a) of this Code section during the period for which the same is required to be kept in his or her office, the Secretary of State or employee of his or her office shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1903, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Requirement that Secretary of State open election records to inspection by public, §

21-2-51

.

Opening of public records for inspection by public generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

21-2-587.
Frauds by poll officers.

Any poll officer who willfully:

Makes a false return of the votes cast at any primary or election;

Deposits fraudulent ballots in the ballot box or certifies as correct a false return of ballots;

Registers fraudulent votes upon any voting machine or certifies as correct a return of fraudulent votes cast upon any voting machine;

Makes any false entries in the electors list;

Destroys or alters any ballot, voter’s certificate, or electors list;

Tampers with any voting machine, direct recording electronic (DRE) equipment, electronic ballot marker, or tabulating machine or device;

Prepares or files any false voter’s certificate not prepared by or for an elector actually voting at such primary or election; or

Fails to return to the officials prescribed by this chapter, following any primary or election, any keys of a voting machine; ballot box; general or duplicate return sheet; tally paper; oaths of poll officers; affidavits of electors and others; record of assisted voters; numbered list of voters; electors list; voter’s certificate; spoiled and canceled ballots; ballots deposited, written, or affixed in or upon a voting machine; DRE, electronic ballot marker, or tabulating machine memory cards; or any certificate or any other paper or record required to be returned under this chapter

shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten years or to pay a fine not to exceed $100,000.00, or both.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1238; Code 1868, § 1319; Code 1873, § 1292; Code 1882, § 1292; Civil Code 1895, § 74; Civil Code 1910, § 84; Code 1933, § 34-1501; Code 1933, § 34-1921, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 65; Ga. L. 2007, p. 536, § 11/SB 40; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 33/HB 540; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 49/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, in paragraph (6), inserted “, electronic ballot marker”, and substituted “tabulating machine” for “tabulating computer”; and, in paragraph (8), substituted semicolons for commas throughout, and inserted “, electronic ballot marker, or tabulating machine” near the end.

Cross references.

Poll officers, §

21-2-90

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-588.
Premature counting of votes by poll officer.

Except as provided in Code Section 21-2-386, any poll officer who counts any votes before the close of the polls or before the last person has voted, whichever occurs later in time, on the day of any primary or election shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1939, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 34/HB 540.

21-2-589.
Willful omissions by poll officers.

Any poll officer who willfully:

Fails to file the voter’s certificate of any elector actually voting at any primary or election;

Fails to record voting information as required by this chapter; or

Fails to insert in the numbered list of voters the name of any person actually voting

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1922, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-590.
Poll officer permitting unregistered or unqualified persons to vote; refusing to permit registered and qualified persons to vote; unlawful rendering of assistance.

Any poll officer who:

Permits any unregistered person to vote at any primary or election, knowing such person is unregistered;

Permits any person registered as an elector to vote, knowing that such person is not qualified to vote, whether or not such person has been challenged;

Refuses to permit any duly registered and qualified person to vote at any primary or election, with the knowledge that such person is entitled to vote; or

Renders assistance to an elector in voting in violation of Code Section 21-2-409, or knowingly permits another person to render such assistance in violation of Code Section 21-2-409

shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1920, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 536, § 12/SB 40.

21-2-591.
Poll officers permitting unlawful assistance to voters.

Any poll officer who permits a voter to be accompanied by another into the voting compartment or voting machine booth when such poll officer knows that the disability which the voter declared at the time of registration no longer exists or that the disability which the voter declared at the time of voting did not exist shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1927, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-592.
Failure of poll officers to keep record of assisted voters.

Any poll officer who willfully fails to keep a record, as required by Code Section 21-2-409, of the name of each voter who received assistance, the exact disability of any assisted voter which makes the assistance necessary, and the name of each person rendering assistance to a voter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1928, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-593.
Failure of law enforcement officers to remove obstacles or to maintain order at polling places; hindrance or delay of poll officers by law enforcement officers.

Any law enforcement officer who:

Willfully neglects or refuses to clear an avenue to the door of any polling place which is obstructed in such a way as to prevent electors from entering, when called upon to do so by any poll officer or elector of the precinct;

Willfully neglects or refuses to maintain order and quell any disturbance if such arises at any polling place upon the day of any primary or election, when called upon to do so by any poll officer or elector of the precinct; or

Willfully hinders or delays, or attempts to hinder or delay, any poll officer in the performance of any duty under this chapter

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1919, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Law enforcement officers generally, T. 35.

21-2-594.
Offenses by printers of ballots.

Any printer employed to print any official ballots for use in a primary or election, or any person engaged in printing the same, who:

Appropriates to himself or herself or gives or delivers, or knowingly permits to be taken, any of said ballots by any unauthorized person; or

Willfully and knowingly prints, or causes to be printed, any official ballot in any form other than that prescribed by the appropriate officials or with any other names or printing, or with the names spelled otherwise than as directed by such officials or the names or printing thereon arranged in any other way than that authorized and directed by this chapter

shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 34-1907, 34-9917; Code 1933, § 34-1911, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 35/HB 540.

21-2-595.
[Reserved] Disposition of alcoholic beverages on primary or election days.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess. p. 26, § 1. For current provisions regarding sale of alcoholic beverages on election days, see §

3-3-20

; repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1268, § 2, effective July 1, 1984.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1268, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1984.

21-2-596.
Failure of public or political officer to perform duty.

Any public officer or any officer of a political party or body on whom a duty is laid by this chapter who willfully neglects or refuses to perform his or her duty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1935, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-597.
Intentional interference with performance of election duties.

Any person who intentionally interferes with, hinders, or delays or attempts to interfere with, hinder, or delay any other person in the performance of any act or duty authorized or imposed by this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1936, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-598.
Violations of chapter.

Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-598

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1, effective January 1, 1999, redesignated former Code Section 21-2-598 as present Code Section 21-2-599.

21-2-599.
Punishment for misdemeanors under chapter.

Any person convicted of a misdemeanor under this chapter shall be subject to any one or more of the following, in the discretion of the trial judge:

A fine of not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00;

A sentence of confinement in the county jail or other place of imprisonment for a period not to exceed six months; or

A sentence of confinement in a county correctional institution or other appropriate institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections not to exceed 12 months.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1941, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 11; Code 1981, §

21-2-598

; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Code 1981, §

21-2-599

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1, effective January 1, 1999, redesignated former Code Section 21-2-598 as present Code Section 21-2-599.

21-2-600.
Punishment for felonies under chapter.

Except as otherwise provided, any person convicted of a felony under this chapter shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than ten years, or both, in the discretion of the trial court, or may be punished as for a misdemeanor in the discretion of the trial court.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1940, enacted by Ga. L. 1964 Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1981, §

21-2-599

; Code 1981, §

21-2-600

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 19, 42; Ga. L. 2007, p. 536, § 13/SB 40.

21-2-601.
Use of list of electors for commercial purposes prohibited.

Any person who intentionally uses the list of electors provided for in Code Section 21-2-225 for commercial purposes shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-600

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 13; Code 1981, §

21-2-601

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1, effective January 1, 1999, redesignated former Code Section 21-2-600 as present Code Section 21-2-601.

21-2-602.
Compensation for soliciting persons to register to vote prohibited.

It shall be illegal to receive, accept, offer, or provide compensation for soliciting persons to register to vote based upon the number of persons registered and any person who knowingly receives, accepts, offers, or provides such compensation on such basis shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-600

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 14; Code 1981, §

21-2-602

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1, effective January 1, 1998, redesignated former Code Section 21-2-601 as present Code Section 21-2-602.

21-2-603.
Conspiracy to commit election fraud.

A person commits the offense of conspiracy to commit election fraud when he or she conspires or agrees with another to commit a violation of this chapter. The crime shall be complete when the conspiracy or agreement is effected and an overt act in furtherance thereof has been committed, regardless of whether the violation of this chapter is consummated. A person convicted of the offense of conspiracy to commit election fraud involving a violation of this chapter which is a felony shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than one-half the maximum period of time for which he or she could have been sentenced if he or she had been convicted of the crime conspired to have been committed, by one-half the maximum fine to which he or she could have been subjected if he or she had been convicted of such crime, or both. A person convicted of the offense of conspiracy to commit election fraud involving a violation of this chapter which is a misdemeanor shall be punished as for a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-603

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 65/HB 244.

21-2-604.
Criminal solicitation to commit election fraud; penalties.

A person commits the offense of criminal solicitation to commit election fraud in the first degree when, with intent that another person engage in conduct constituting a felony under this article, he or she solicits, requests, commands, importunes, or otherwise attempts to cause the other person to engage in such conduct.

A person commits the offense of criminal solicitation to commit election fraud in the second degree when, with intent that another person engage in conduct constituting a misdemeanor under this article, he or she solicits, requests, commands, importunes, or otherwise attempts to cause the other person to engage in such conduct.

A person convicted of the offense of criminal solicitation to commit election fraud in the first degree shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than three years.

A person convicted of the offense of criminal solicitation to commit election fraud in the second degree shall be punished as for a misdemeanor.

It is no defense to a prosecution for criminal solicitation to commit election fraud that the person solicited could not be guilty of the crime solicited.

The provisions of subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section are cumulative and shall not supersede any other penal law of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-604

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 21/SB 82.